Nevada, session 2025Special36, AB3.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 293.177 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.177 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.165
and 293.166, a name may not be printed on a ballot to be used at a
primary election unless the person named has filed a declaration of
candidacy with the appropriate filing officer and paid the filing fee
required by NRS 293.193 not earlier than:
(a) For a candidate for judicial office, the first Monday in
January of the year in which the election is to be held and not later
than 5 p.m. on the second Friday after the first Monday in January;
and
(b) For all other candidates, the first Monday in March of the
year in which the election is to be held and not later than 5 p.m. on
the second Friday after the first Monday in March.
2. A declaration of candidacy required to be filed pursuant to
this chapter must be in substantially the following form:
(a) For partisan office:
DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................
State of Nevada
County of ..............................
For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the ................ Party nomination for
the office of ........., I, the undersigned ........, do swear or
affirm under penalty of perjury that I actually, as opposed to
constructively, reside at .........., in the City or Town of .......,
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 3 –
County of .........., State of Nevada; that my actual, as opposed
to constructive, residence in the State, district, county,
township, city or other area prescribed by law to which the
office pertains began on a date at least 30 days immediately
preceding the date of the close of filing of declarations of
candidacy for this office; that my telephone number is
............, and the address at which I receive mail, if different
than my residence, is .........; that I am registered as a member
of the ................ Party; that I am a qualified elector pursuant
to Section 1 of Article 2 of the Constitution of the State of
Nevada; if I am filing for a public office other than a federal
office, I am registered to vote in the City or Town of .......,
County of .........., State of Nevada; that if I have ever been
convicted of treason or a felony, my civil rights have been
restored; that I have not, in violation of the provisions of NRS
293.176, changed the designation of my political party or
political party affiliation on an official application to register
to vote in any state since December 31 before the closing
filing date for this election; that I generally believe in and
intend to support the concepts found in the principles and
policies of that political party in the coming election; that if
nominated as a candidate of the ................ Party at the
ensuing election, I will accept that nomination and not
withdraw; that I will not knowingly violate any election law
or any law defining and prohibiting corrupt and fraudulent
practices in campaigns and elections in this State; that I will
qualify for the office if elected thereto, including, but not
limited to, complying with any limitation prescribed by the
Constitution and laws of this State concerning the number of
years or terms for which a person may hold the office; that I
understand that knowingly and willfully filing a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement is a crime
punishable as a gross misdemeanor and also subjects me to a
civil action disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of
the office; and that I understand that my name will appear on
all ballots as designated in this declaration.
...........................................................
(Designation of name)
...........................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 4 –
Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......
............................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath
(b) For nonpartisan office:
DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................
State of Nevada
County of ..............................
For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the office of ................, I, the
undersigned ................, do swear or affirm under penalty of
perjury that I actually, as opposed to constructively, reside at
........., in the City or Town of ......., County of ........., State of
Nevada; that my actual, as opposed to constructive, residence
in the State, district, county, township, city or other area
prescribed by law to which the office pertains began on a date
at least 30 days immediately preceding the date of the close
of filing of declarations of candidacy for this office; that my
telephone number is ..........., and the address at which I
receive mail, if different than my residence, is ..........; that I
am a qualified elector pursuant to Section 1 of Article 2 of the
Constitution of the State of Nevada; if I am filing for a public
office other than a federal office, I am registered to vote in
the City or Town of ......., County of .........., State of Nevada;
that if I have ever been convicted of treason or a felony, my
civil rights have been restored; that if nominated as a
nonpartisan candidate at the ensuing election, I will accept the
nomination and not withdraw; that I will not knowingly
violate any election law or any law defining and prohibiting
corrupt and fraudulent practices in campaigns and elections in
this State; that I will qualify for the office if elected thereto,
including, but not limited to, complying with any limitation
prescribed by the Constitution and laws of this State
concerning the number of years or terms for which a person
may hold the office; that I understand that knowingly and
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 5 –
willfully filing a declaration of candidacy which contains a
false statement is a crime punishable as a gross misdemeanor
and also subjects me to a civil action disqualifying me from
entering upon the duties of the office; and that I understand
that my name will appear on all ballots as designated in this
declaration.
...........................................................
(Designation of name)
...........................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)
Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......
............................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath
3. The address of a candidate which must be included in the
declaration of candidacy pursuant to subsection 2 must be the street
address of the residence where the candidate actually, as opposed to
constructively, resides in accordance with NRS 281.050, if one has
been assigned. The declaration of candidacy must not be accepted
for filing if the candidate fails to comply with the following
provisions of this subsection or, if applicable, the provisions of
subsection 4:
(a) The candidate shall not list the candidate’s address as a post
office box unless a street address has not been assigned to his or her
residence; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the candidate
shall present to the filing officer:
(1) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate
and the candidate’s residential address; or
(2) A current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, or
document issued by a governmental entity, including a check which
indicates the candidate’s name and residential address, but not
including a voter registration card.
4. If the candidate executes an oath or affirmation under
penalty of perjury stating that the candidate is unable to present to
the filing officer the proof of residency required by subsection 3
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 6 –
because a street address has not been assigned to the candidate’s
residence or because the rural or remote location of the candidate’s
residence makes it impracticable to present the proof of residency
required by subsection 3, the candidate shall present to the filing
officer:
(a) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate;
and
(b) Alternative proof of the candidate’s residential address that
the filing officer determines is sufficient to verify where the
candidate actually, as opposed to constructively, resides in
accordance with NRS 281.050. The Secretary of State may adopt
regulations establishing the forms of alternative proof of the
candidate’s residential address that the filing officer may accept to
verify where the candidate actually, as opposed to constructively,
resides in accordance with NRS 281.050.
5. The filing officer shall retain a copy of the proof of identity
and residency provided by the candidate pursuant to subsection 3 or
4. [Such] Except for any information required to be kept
confidential pursuant to NRS 293.906, such a copy:
(a) May not be withheld from the public; and
(b) Must not contain the social security number, driver’s license
or identification card number or account number of the candidate.
6. By filing the declaration of candidacy, the candidate shall be
deemed to have appointed the filing officer for the office as his or
her agent for service of process for the purposes of a proceeding
pursuant to NRS 293.182. Service of such process must first be
attempted at the appropriate address as specified by the candidate in
the declaration of candidacy. If the candidate cannot be served at
that address, service must be made by personally delivering to and
leaving with the filing officer duplicate copies of the process. The
filing officer shall immediately send, by registered or certified mail,
one of the copies to the candidate at the specified address, unless the
candidate has designated in writing to the filing officer a different
address for that purpose, in which case the filing officer shall mail
the copy to the last address so designated.
7. [A] Except for any information required to be kept
confidential pursuant to NRS 293.906, a declaration of candidacy
filed pursuant to this section is a public record and the filing officer
shall make the declaration of candidacy available to the public in an
electronic format.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 7 –
8. If the filing officer receives credible evidence indicating that
a candidate has been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her
civil rights restored, the filing officer:
(a) May conduct an investigation to determine whether the
candidate has been convicted of a felony and, if so, whether the
candidate has had his or her civil rights restored; and
(b) Shall transmit the credible evidence and the findings from
such investigation to the Attorney General, if the filing officer is the
Secretary of State, or to the district attorney, if the filing officer is a
person other than the Secretary of State.
9. The receipt of information by the Attorney General or
district attorney pursuant to subsection 8 must be treated as a
challenge of a candidate pursuant to subsections 4 and 5 of NRS
293.182 to which the provisions of NRS 293.2045 apply.
10. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement in violation of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 2. NRS 293.181 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.181 1. A candidate for the office of State Senator,
Assemblyman or Assemblywoman must execute and file, with his
or her declaration of candidacy, a declaration of residency which
must be in substantially the following form:
I, the undersigned, do swear or affirm under penalty of
perjury that I have been a citizen resident of this State as
required by NRS 218A.200; that I understand that knowingly
and willfully filing a declaration of residency which contains
a false statement is a crime punishable as a gross
misdemeanor and also subjects me to a civil action
disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of the office;
and that I have actually, as opposed to constructively, resided
at the following residence or residences since November 1 of
the preceding year:
......................................... ...........................................
Street Address Street Address
......................................... ...........................................
City or Town City or Town
......................................... ...........................................
State State
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 8 –
From ............ To ............. From ............. To ..............
Dates of Residency Dates of Residency
......................................... ...........................................
Street Address Street Address
......................................... ...........................................
City or Town City or Town
......................................... ...........................................
State State
From ............ To ............. From ............. To ..............
Dates of Residency Dates of Residency
(Attach additional sheet or sheets of residences as necessary)
2. Each address of a candidate which must be included in the
declaration of residency pursuant to subsection 1 must be the street
address of the residence where the candidate actually, as opposed to
constructively, resided or resides in accordance with NRS 281.050,
if one has been assigned. The declaration of residency must not be
accepted for filing if any of the candidate’s addresses are listed as a
post office box unless a street address has not been assigned to the
residence.
3. [A] Except for any information required to be kept
confidential pursuant to NRS 293.906, a declaration of residency
filed pursuant to this section is a public record and the filing officer
shall make the declaration of residency available to the public in an
electronic format.
4. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a declaration
of residency which contains a false statement in violation of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 3. NRS 293.908 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.908 1. The following persons may request that personal
information contained in the records of the Secretary of State or a
county or city clerk be kept confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any judicial personnel of an Indian tribe.
(e) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(f) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 9 –
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(g) Any public officer.
(h) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
[(h)] (i) Any firefighter or retired firefighter.
[(i)] (j) Any prosecutor.
[(j)] (k) Any state or county public defender.
[(k)] (l) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney
General who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of
Nevada or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
[(l)] (m) Any person, including, without limitation, a social
worker, employed by this State or a political subdivision of this
State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
[(m)] (n) Any county manager in this State.
[(n)] (o) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this
State or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
[(o)] (p) Any civilian employee who provides support services
to a law enforcement agency.
[(p)] (q) Any provider of health care who practices in
reproductive health.
[(q)] (r) Any employee of or volunteer for a health care facility
that provides services related to reproductive health.
[(r)] (s) Any provider of gender-affirming care.
[(s)] (t) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a person
described in paragraphs (a) to [(r),] (s), inclusive.
[(t)] (u) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(r),] (s), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 10 –
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Firefighter” means a person who is an employee of a fire-
fighting agency and whose principal duties are to control,
extinguish, prevent and suppress fires.
(e) “Fire-fighting agency” means a public fire department, fire
protection district or other agency of this State or a political
subdivision of this State, the primary functions of which are to
control, extinguish, prevent and suppress fires.
(f) “Gender-affirming care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 603A.435.
(g) “Health care facility” means any facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 449 of NRS.
(h) “Indian tribe” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25 U.S.C. §
3602(3).
(i) “Judicial personnel” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25
U.S.C. § 3602(4).
(j) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 289.010.
(k) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
(l) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
(m) “Provider of health care” means a person who is licensed,
certified or otherwise authorized by the laws of this State to
administer health care in the ordinary course of business or practice
of a profession.
(n) “Public officer” means a person elected or appointed to a
position which:
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 11 –
(1) Is established by the Constitution or a statute of this
State, or by a charter or ordinance of a political subdivision of this
State; and
(2) Involves the continuous exercise, as part of the regular
and permanent administration of the government, of a public
power, trust or duty.
(o) “Reproductive health” means all health care matters relating
to pregnancy, including, without limitation, prenatal care, childbirth,
postpartum care, birth control, vasectomy, tubal ligation, abortion,
abortion care, management of a miscarriage and infertility care.
[(o)] (p) “Social worker” means any person licensed under
chapter 641B of NRS.
Sec. 4. NRS 293C.185 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.185 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293C.190,
a name may not be printed on a ballot to be used at a primary or
general city election unless the person named has, in accordance
with NRS 293C.145 or 293C.175, as applicable, timely filed a
declaration of candidacy with the appropriate filing officer and paid
the filing fee established by the governing body of the city.
2. A declaration of candidacy required to be filed pursuant to
this chapter must be in substantially the following form:
DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................
State of Nevada
City of ....................................
For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the office of .................., I,
.................., the undersigned do swear or affirm under penalty
of perjury that I actually, as opposed to constructively, reside
at .................., in the City or Town of .................., County of
.................., State of Nevada; that my actual, as opposed to
constructive, residence in the city, township or other area
prescribed by law to which the office pertains began on a date
at least 30 days immediately preceding the date of the close
of filing of declarations of candidacy for this office; that my
telephone number is .................., and the address at which I
receive mail, if different than my residence, is ..................;
that I am a qualified elector pursuant to Section 1 of Article 2
of the Constitution of the State of Nevada; that I am
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 12 –
registered to vote in the City or Town of .................., County
of .................., State of Nevada; that if I have ever been
convicted of treason or a felony, my civil rights have been
restored; that if nominated as a candidate at the ensuing
election I will accept the nomination and not withdraw; that I
will not knowingly violate any election law or any law
defining and prohibiting corrupt and fraudulent practices in
campaigns and elections in this State; that I will qualify for
the office if elected thereto, including, but not limited to,
complying with any limitation prescribed by the Constitution
and laws of this State concerning the number of years or
terms for which a person may hold the office; that I
understand that knowingly and willfully filing a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement is a crime
punishable as a gross misdemeanor and also subjects me to a
civil action disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of
the office; and that I understand that my name will appear on
all ballots as designated in this declaration.
...........................................................
(Designation of name)
...........................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)
Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......
............................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath
3. The address of a candidate that must be included in the
declaration of candidacy pursuant to subsection 2 must be the street
address of the residence where the candidate actually, as opposed to
constructively, resides in accordance with NRS 281.050, if one has
been assigned. The declaration of candidacy must not be accepted
for filing if the candidate fails to comply with the following
provisions of this subsection or, if applicable, the provisions of
subsection 4:
(a) The candidate shall not list the candidate’s address as a post
office box unless a street address has not been assigned to the
residence; and
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 13 –
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the candidate
shall present to the filing officer:
(1) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate
and the candidate’s residential address; or
(2) A current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, or
document issued by a governmental entity, including a check which
indicates the candidate’s name and residential address, but not
including a voter registration card.
4. If the candidate executes an oath or affirmation under
penalty of perjury stating that the candidate is unable to present to
the filing officer the proof of residency required by subsection 3
because a street address has not been assigned to the candidate’s
residence or because the rural or remote location of the candidate’s
residence makes it impracticable to present the proof of residency
required by subsection 3, the candidate shall present to the filing
officer:
(a) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate;
and
(b) Alternative proof of the candidate’s residential address that
the filing officer determines is sufficient to verify where the
candidate actually, as opposed to constructively, resides in
accordance with NRS 281.050. The Secretary of State may adopt
regulations establishing the forms of alternative proof of the
candidate’s residential address that the filing officer may accept to
verify where the candidate actually, as opposed to constructively,
resides in accordance with NRS 281.050.
5. The filing officer shall retain a copy of the proof of identity
and residency provided by the candidate pursuant to subsection 3 or
4. [Such] Except for any information required to be kept
confidential pursuant to NRS 293.906, such a copy:
(a) May not be withheld from the public; and
(b) Must not contain the social security number, driver’s license
or identification card number or account number of the candidate.
6. By filing the declaration of candidacy, the candidate shall be
deemed to have appointed the city clerk as his or her agent for
service of process for the purposes of a proceeding pursuant to NRS
293C.186. Service of such process must first be attempted at the
appropriate address as specified by the candidate in the declaration
of candidacy. If the candidate cannot be served at that address,
service must be made by personally delivering to and leaving with
the city clerk duplicate copies of the process. The city clerk shall
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 14 –
immediately send, by registered or certified mail, one of the copies
to the candidate at the specified address, unless the candidate has
designated in writing to the city clerk a different address for that
purpose, in which case the city clerk shall mail the copy to the last
address so designated.
7. [A] Except for any information required to be kept
confidential pursuant to NRS 293.906, a declaration of candidacy
filed pursuant to this section is a public record and the filing officer
shall make the declaration of candidacy available to the public in an
electronic format.
8. If the city clerk receives credible evidence indicating that a
candidate has been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her
civil rights restored, the city clerk:
(a) May conduct an investigation to determine whether the
candidate has been convicted of a felony and, if so, whether the
candidate has had his or her civil rights restored; and
(b) Shall transmit the credible evidence and the findings from
such investigation to the city attorney.
9. The receipt of information by the city attorney pursuant to
subsection 8 must be treated as a challenge of a candidate pursuant
to subsections 4 and 5 of NRS 293C.186 to which the provisions of
NRS 293.2045 apply.
10. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement in violation of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 5. NRS 294A.0035 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.0035 “Campaign expenses” means:
1. All expenses incurred by a candidate for a campaign,
including, without limitation:
(a) Office expenses;
(b) Expenses related to volunteers;
(c) Expenses related to travel;
(d) Expenses related to advertising;
(e) Expenses related to paid staff;
(f) Expenses related to consultants;
(g) Expenses related to polling;
(h) Expenses related to special events;
(i) Expenses related to a legal defense fund;
(j) Expenses related to personal security;
(k) Contributions made to another candidate, a nonprofit
corporation that is registered or required to be registered pursuant to
NRS 294A.225, a committee for political action that is registered or
required to be registered pursuant to NRS 294A.230 or a committee
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 15 –
for the recall of a public officer that is registered or required to be
registered pursuant to NRS 294A.250;
[(k)] (l) Fees for filing declarations of candidacy; and
[(l)] (m) Repayment or forgiveness of a loan.
2. Expenditures, as defined in NRS 294A.0075.
3. The disposal of any unspent contributions pursuant to NRS
294A.117 or 294A.160.
Sec. 6. NRS 294A.011 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.011 1. “Personal use” means any use of contributions
to fulfill a commitment, obligation or expense of:
[1.] (a) A candidate that would exist irrespective of his or her
campaign.
[2.] (b) A public officer that would exist irrespective of the
duties of his or her public office,
 as applicable.
2. The term does not include, without limitation, the use of
contributions to fulfill a commitment, obligation or expense for
personal security incurred in direct connection to the campaign of
the candidate or public office of the public officer.
Sec. 7. NRS 294A.365 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.365 1. Each report required pursuant to NRS
294A.210, 294A.220 and 294A.280 must consist of a list of each
expenditure in excess of $100 or $1,000, as is appropriate, that was
made during the periods for reporting. Each report required pursuant
to NRS 294A.125 and 294A.200 must consist of a list of each
campaign expense in excess of $100 that was incurred during the
periods for reporting. The list in each report must state the category
and amount of the campaign expense or expenditure and the date on
which the campaign expense was incurred or the expenditure was
made.
2. The categories of campaign expense or expenditure for use
on the report of campaign expenses or expenditures are:
(a) Office expenses;
(b) Expenses related to volunteers;
(c) Expenses related to travel;
(d) Expenses related to advertising;
(e) Expenses related to paid staff;
(f) Expenses related to consultants;
(g) Expenses related to polling;
(h) Expenses related to special events;
(i) Expenses related to a legal defense fund;
(j) Expenses related to personal security;
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 16 –
(k) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 294A.362, goods and
services provided in kind for which money would otherwise have
been paid;
[(k)] (l) Contributions made to another candidate, a nonprofit
corporation that is registered or required to be registered pursuant to
NRS 294A.225, a committee for political action that is registered or
required to be registered pursuant to NRS 294A.230 or a committee
for the recall of a public officer that is registered or required to be
registered pursuant to NRS 294A.250;
[(l)] (m) Fees for filing declarations of candidacy;
[(m)] (n) Repayments or forgiveness of loans;
[(n)] (o) The disposal of unspent contributions pursuant to NRS
294A.117 or 294A.160; and
[(o)] (p) Other miscellaneous expenses.
3. Each report of campaign expenses or expenditures described
in subsection 1 must:
(a) List the disposition of any unspent contributions using the
categories set forth in NRS 294A.117, subsection 3 of NRS
294A.160 or subsection 3 of NRS 294A.286, as applicable; and
(b) For any campaign expense or expenditure that is paid for
using a credit card or debit card, itemize each transaction and
identify the business or other entity from whom the purchase of the
campaign expense or expenditure was made.
Sec. 8. NRS 247.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
247.540 1. The following persons may request that the
personal information described in subsection 1, 2 or 3 of NRS
247.520 that is contained in the records of a county recorder be kept
confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any judicial personnel of an Indian tribe.
(e) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(f) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(g) Any public officer.
(h) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
[(h)] (i) Any firefighter or retired firefighter.
[(i)] (j) Any prosecutor.
[(j)] (k) Any state or county public defender.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 17 –
[(k)] (l) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney
General who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of
Nevada or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
[(l)] (m) Any person, including, without limitation, a social
worker, employed by this State or a political subdivision of this
State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
[(m)] (n) Any county manager in this State.
[(n)] (o) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this
State or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
[(o)] (p) Any civilian employee who provides support services
to a law enforcement agency.
[(p)] (q) Any provider of health care who practices in
reproductive health.
[(q)] (r) Any employee of or volunteer for a health care facility
that provides services related to reproductive health.
[(r)] (s) Any provider of gender-affirming care.
[(s)] (t) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a person
described in paragraphs (a) to [(r),] (s), inclusive.
[(t)] (u) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(r),] (s), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
[(u)] (v) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been
issued pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. Any nonprofit entity in this State that maintains a
confidential location for the purpose of providing shelter to victims
of domestic violence may request that the personal information
described in subsection 4 of NRS 247.520 that is contained in the
records of a county recorder be kept confidential.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 18 –
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Firefighter” means a person who is an employee of a fire-
fighting agency and whose principal duties are to control,
extinguish, prevent and suppress fires.
(e) “Fire-fighting agency” means a public fire department, fire
protection district or other agency of this State or a political
subdivision of this State, the primary functions of which are to
control, extinguish, prevent and suppress fires.
(f) “Gender-affirming care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 603A.435.
(g) “Health care facility” means any facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 449 of NRS.
(h) “Indian tribe” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25 U.S.C. §
3602(3).
(i) “Judicial personnel” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25
U.S.C. § 3602(4).
(j) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 289.010.
(k) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
(l) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
(m) “Provider of health care” means a person who is licensed,
certified or otherwise authorized by the laws of this State to
administer health care in the ordinary course of business or practice
of a profession.
(n) “Public officer” means a person elected or appointed to a
position which:
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 19 –
(1) Is established by the Constitution or a statute of this
State, or by a charter or ordinance of a political subdivision of this
State; and
(2) Involves the continuous exercise, as part of the regular
and permanent administration of the government, of a public
power, trust or duty.
(o) “Reproductive health” means all health care matters relating
to pregnancy, including, without limitation, prenatal care, childbirth,
postpartum care, birth control, vasectomy, tubal ligation, abortion,
abortion care, management of a miscarriage and infertility care.
[(o)] (p) “Social worker” means any person licensed under
chapter 641B of NRS.
Sec. 9. NRS 250.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
250.140 1. The following persons may request that personal
information described in subsection 1, 2 or 3 of NRS 250.120 that is
contained in the records of a county assessor be kept confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any judicial personnel of an Indian tribe.
(e) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(f) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(g) Any public officer.
(h) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
[(h)] (i) Any firefighter or retired firefighter.
[(i)] (j) Any prosecutor.
[(j)] (k) Any state or county public defender.
[(k)] (l) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney
General who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of
Nevada or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
[(l)] (m) Any person, including, without limitation, a social
worker, employed by this State or a political subdivision of this
State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
[(m)] (n) Any county manager in this State.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 20 –
[(n)] (o) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this
State or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
[(o)] (p) Any civilian employee who provides support services
to a law enforcement agency.
[(p)] (q) Any provider of health care who practices in
reproductive health.
[(q)] (r) Any employee of or volunteer for a health care facility
that provides services related to reproductive health.
[(r)] (s) Any provider of gender-affirming care.
[(s)] (t) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a person
described in paragraphs (a) to [(r),] (s), inclusive.
[(t)] (u) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(r),] (s), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
[(u)] (v) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been
issued pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. Any nonprofit entity in this State that maintains a
confidential location for the purpose of providing shelter to victims
of domestic violence may request that the personal information
described in subsection 4 of NRS 250.120 that is contained in the
records of a county assessor be kept confidential.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Firefighter” means a person who is an employee of a fire-
fighting agency and whose principal duties are to control,
extinguish, prevent and suppress fires.
(e) “Fire-fighting agency” means a public fire department, fire
protection district or other agency of this State or a political
subdivision of this State, the primary functions of which are to
control, extinguish, prevent and suppress fires.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 21 –
(f) “Gender-affirming care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 603A.435.
(g) “Health care facility” means any facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 449 of NRS.
(h) “Indian tribe” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25 U.S.C. §
3602(3).
(i) “Judicial personnel” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25
U.S.C. § 3602(4).
(j) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 289.010.
(k) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
(l) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
(m) “Provider of health care” means a person who is licensed,
certified or otherwise authorized by the laws of this State to
administer health care in the ordinary course of business or practice
of a profession.
(n) “Public officer” means a person elected or appointed to a
position which:
(1) Is established by the Constitution or a statute of this
State, or by a charter or ordinance of a political subdivision of this
State; and
(2) Involves the continuous exercise, as part of the regular
and permanent administration of the government, of a public
power, trust or duty.
(o) “Reproductive health” means all health care matters relating
to pregnancy, including, without limitation, prenatal care, childbirth,
postpartum care, birth control, vasectomy, tubal ligation, abortion,
abortion care, management of a miscarriage and infertility care.
[(o)] (p) “Social worker” means any person licensed under
chapter 641B of NRS.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 22 –
Sec. 10. NRS 481.091 is hereby amended to read as follows:
481.091 1. The following persons may request that the
Department display an alternate address on the person’s driver’s
license, commercial driver’s license or identification card:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any judicial personnel of an Indian tribe.
(e) Any clerk of the court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(f) Any public officer.
(g) Any firefighter or retired firefighter.
[(g)] (h) Any prosecutor who as part of his or her normal job
responsibilities prosecutes persons for:
(1) Crimes that are punishable as category A felonies; or
(2) Domestic violence.
[(h)] (i) Any state or county public defender who as part of his
or her normal job responsibilities defends persons for:
(1) Crimes that are punishable as category A felonies; or
(2) Domestic violence.
[(i)] (j) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney
General who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of
Nevada or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
[(j)] (k) Any person, including, without limitation, a social
worker, employed by this State or a political subdivision of this
State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
[(k)] (l) Any county manager in this State.
[(l)] (m) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this
State or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
[(m)] (n) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged
with the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 23 –
appointed by the county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the
elections division of the county or city.
[(n)] (o) Any civilian employee who provides support services
to a law enforcement agency.
[(o)] (p) Any provider of health care who practices in
reproductive health.
[(p)] (q) Any employee of or volunteer for a health care facility
that provides services related to reproductive health.
[(q)] (r) Any provider of gender-affirming care.
[(r)] (s) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a person
described in paragraphs (a) to [(q),] (r), inclusive.
[(s)] (t) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(q),] (r), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
[(t)] (u) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been
issued pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. A person who wishes to have an alternate address displayed
on his or her driver’s license, commercial driver’s license or
identification card pursuant to this section must submit to the
Department satisfactory proof:
(a) That he or she is a person described in subsection 1; and
(b) Of the person’s address of principal residence and mailing
address, if different from the address of principal residence.
3. A person who obtains a driver’s license, commercial driver’s
license or identification card that displays an alternate address
pursuant to this section may subsequently submit a request to the
Department to have his or her address of principal residence
displayed on his or her driver’s license, commercial driver’s license
or identification card instead of the alternate address.
4. The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Firefighter” means a person who is an employee of a fire-
fighting agency and whose principal duties are to control,
extinguish, prevent and suppress fires.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 24 –
(e) “Fire-fighting agency” means a public fire department, fire
protection district or other agency of this State or a political
subdivision of this State, the primary functions of which are to
control, extinguish, prevent and suppress fires.
(f) “Gender-affirming care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 603A.435.
(g) “Health care facility” means any facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 449 of NRS.
(h) “Indian tribe” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25 U.S.C. §
3602(3).
(i) “Judicial personnel” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25
U.S.C. § 3602(4).
(j) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 289.010.
(k) “Provider of health care” means a person who is licensed,
certified or otherwise authorized by the laws of this State to
administer health care in the ordinary course of business or practice
of a profession.
(l) “Public officer” means a person elected or appointed to a
position which:
(1) Is established by the Constitution or a statute of this
State, or by a charter or ordinance of a political subdivision of this
State; and
(2) Involves the continuous exercise, as part of the regular
and permanent administration of the government, of a public
power, trust or duty.
(m) “Reproductive health” means all health care matters relating
to pregnancy, including, without limitation, prenatal care, childbirth,
postpartum care, birth control, vasectomy, tubal ligation, abortion,
abortion care, management of a miscarriage and infertility care.
[(m)] (n) “Social worker” means any person licensed under
chapter 641B of NRS.
Sec. 11. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430 and
218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the expiration of
the period prescribed for the return of a fiscal note in NRS
218D.475. This section applies retroactively from and after
November 13, 2025.
Sec. 12. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
36th Special Session (2025)